Utah statutes.
26-8a-504.   Discipline of designated and licensed providers.
(1)  The department may refuse to issue a license or designation or a renewal,
or revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on probation, an emergency medical
service provider's license or designation if the provider has:
(a)  failed to abide by terms of the license or designation;
(b)  violated statute or rule;
(c)  failed to provide services at the level or in the exclusive geographic
service area required by the license or designation;
(d)  failed to submit a renewal application in a timely fashion as required by
department rule;
(e)  failed to follow operational standards established by the committee; or
(f)  committed an act in the performance of a professional duty that
endangered the public or constituted gross negligence.
(2) (a)  An action to revoke, suspend, restrict, or place a license or
designation on probation shall be done in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter
4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), the department may issue a cease and
desist order under Section 26-8a-507 to immediately suspend a license or
designation pending an administrative proceeding to be held within 30 days if
there is evidence to show that the provider or facility poses a clear,
immediate, and unjustifiable threat or potential threat to the public health,
safety, or welfare.
(3)  In addition to taking disciplinary action under Subsection (1), the
department may impose sanctions in accordance with Section 26-23-6.
